Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-708
Joint authority; foster, promote, and develop commercial and general aviation.

A joint airport authority shall, in addition to the powers enumerated in section 3-707, encourage, foster, and promote the development of commercial and general aviation for the area which it serves, and advance the interest of such area in aeronautics and in commercial air transportation and its scheduling. A joint airport authority may represent the interest of such area in commercial air service hearings.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 8, p. 210.